Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299C.07, is amended to read: 299C.07 RESTORATION OR DISPOSAL OF STOLEN PROPERTY. The Bureau of Criminal Apprehension deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end make every effort for a period of 90 days after the seizure or recovery of abandoned or stolen property to return the property to the lawful owner or to the sheriff of the county from which it was stolen. Any such property held by the bureau for more than 90 days, in case the owner cannot be found or if it cannot be determined from what county the property was stolen, deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be sold at public auction by the superintendent of the bureau, or the superintendent's agent, after two weeks' published notice thereof in a legal newspaper in Ramsey County, stating the time and place of the sale and a list of the property to be sold. The proceeds of the sale deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be applied in payment of the necessary expenses of the sale and all necessary costs, storage, or charges incurred in relation to the property. The balance of the proceeds deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be deleted text begin paiddeleted text end new text begin depositednew text end into the deleted text begin generaldeleted text end new text begin public safety radio account in the special revenuenew text end fund. Sec. 2. new text begin [403.111] PUBLIC SAFETY RADIO ACCOUNT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Account established. new text end new text begin The public safety radio account is established in the special revenue fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Source of funds. new text end new text begin The account consists of money deposited in the account from the fee imposed under section 299C.46, subdivision 3, and any interest or earnings of the account. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Appropriation; statewide public safety radio communication system equipment grants. new text end new text begin Money in the public safety radio account is appropriated to the commissioner for grants to local government units, federally recognized Tribal entities, and state agencies participating in the statewide Allied Radio Matrix for Emergency Response (ARMER) public safety radio communication system established under section 403.36, subdivision 1e. The grants must be used to purchase or upgrade portable radios, mobile radios, and related equipment that are interoperable with the ARMER system. Grants for nonstate agencies are contingent upon a match of at least five percent from nonstate funds. The director of the Department of Public Safety Emergency Communication Networks Division, in consultation with the Statewide Emergency Communications Board, must administer the grant program. Notwithstanding section 16B.98, subdivision 14, up to two percent of the appropriation is available for grant administration. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin By January 15, 2027, and each year thereafter, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety policy and finance on the account established under subdivision 1. The report must provide detailed information on the money deposited in the account and grants awarded under subdivision 3. new text end